Hawaii statutes.
§232-1 Appeals by persons under contractual
obligations. Whenever any person is under a contractual obligation to pay
a tax assessed against another, the person shall have the same rights of appeal
to the board of review, the tax appeal court, and the intermediate appellate
court, subject to chapter 602, in the person's own name, as if the tax were
assessed against the person. The person against whom the tax is assessed shall
also have a right to appear and be heard on any such application or appeal. [L
1932 2d, c 40, §55; RL 1935, §1936; RL 1945, §5201; RL 1955, §116-1; HRS
§232-1; gen ch 1985; am L 2004, c 202, §18; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c
109, §1]

Case Notes

When lessee may properly appeal. 33 H. 214.

A party with a secondary contractual obligation to pay the
tax assessed against another has a right under this section to challenge that
assessment to the tax appeal court. 85 H. 36, 936 P.2d 672.

A person under a contractual obligation to pay property taxes
need not pay the taxes in order to perfect an appeal of the tax assessment. 85
H. 36, 936 P.2d 672.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next